Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
PART 5
H

ERTY ADVANCED MATERIALS DEVELOPMENT CENTER

12-6-130 through 12-6-139.

Reserved. Redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 375, § 1/SB 396, effective July 1, 2012.

Editor's notes.

- Former Code Sections 12-6-130 through 12-6-139, concerning the Herty Advanced Materials Development Center, were based on Ga. L. 1937-38, Ex. Sess., p. 191,

§§

1-6; Ga. L. 1972, p. 1015,

§

1526; Ga. L. 1978, p. 2055,

§

1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 362,

§§

1-4; Ga. L. 2005, p. 1036,

§

9/SB 49; Ga. L. 2006, p. 304,

§§

1-8/HB 1184. For present comparable provisions, see Code Section 20-3-73.3.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 375,

§

1/SB 396, effective July 1, 2012, redesignated former Code Sections 12-6-130 through 12-6-131 as present Code Section 20-3-73.3.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 375,

§

2/SB 396, effective July 1, 2012, reserved the designation of this part.